Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 2 Marriage Licenses

15-2-1.
License required — Proof of divorce — Obligation of clerk to issue license.

Persons intending to be joined together in marriage in this state must first obtain a license from the clerk of the town or city in which:

Either party to the proposed marriage resides; or

The proposed marriage is to be performed, if both parties are nonresidents of this state.

Before any license shall be issued to any person who, having been previously married or a party to another relationship that provides substantially the same rights, benefits and responsibilities as a marriage, has been divorced, the person shall present to the town or city clerk an authenticated copy of the decree granting the divorce or an authenticated copy of the final dissolution of the previous relationship.

The town or city clerk shall issue a license to any person eligible to marry under the provisions of chapter 15-1.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 10; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 10; P.L. 1909, ch. 430, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 10; P.L. 1927, ch. 1064, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2580, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-1

; P.L. 1961, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 3.

15-2-1.1.
Statewide electronic marriage license system.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

15-2-1

, at such time as the director of health adopts and implements a statewide electronic marriage license issuance and record registration system, the license may be obtained from the clerk in any city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 200, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 258, § 3.

15-2-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 24; P.L. 1917, ch. 1531, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-2

; Repealed by P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 28, effective April 14, 2004.

15-2-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 191, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 91, § 1, effective July 1, 1995.

15-2-3.1.
Fetal Alcohol Syndrome warning law.

With each marriage license, the town or city clerk shall provide information describing the causes and effects of fetal alcohol syndrome.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 624, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 258, § 1.

15-2-4, 15-2-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 10; P.L. 1938, ch. 2580, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §§

15-2-4

and 15-2-5; P.L. 1975, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 120); Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 8, effective August 9, 1996.

15-2-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 10; P.L. 1938, ch. 2580, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-6

; Repealed by P.L. 2004, ch. 200, § 2, effective June 29, 2004; P.L. 2004, ch. 258, § 2, effective July 1, 2004.

15-2-7.
Form and contents of certificates, reports, and other returns.

The forms of certificates, reports, and other returns required by this chapter, or by regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, shall include as a minimum the items recommended by the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics, subject to approval of and modification by the state director of health. Both parties shall subscribe to the truth of data in the application in the presence of the local registrar or his or her assistant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 10; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 10; P.L. 1909, ch. 430, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 10; P.L. 1927, ch. 1064, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2580, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-7

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 3.

15-2-8.
Period of validity of license — Return if unused.

The license required by §

15-2-1

shall be valid for three (3) months after the date of issue, and if unused at the expiration of the three (3) months, the party or parties having possession of the license shall immediately return it to the town or city clerk from whom it was obtained.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 10; P.L. 1927, ch. 1064, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2580, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-8

.

15-2-9.
License fee — Presentation of license to person performing ceremony.

For issuing the license the town or city clerk shall collect a fee of fourteen dollars ($14.00). The license shall be presented to the minister, elder, justice, warden, or other person who performs the marriage ceremony. The city or town shall retain six dollars ($6.00) of the fourteen dollars ($14.00) for its own use and in lieu of any reimbursement to which it may be entitled pursuant to §

45-13-7

. The city or town shall forward the eight dollars ($8.00) balance of the fourteen dollars ($14.00) to the general treasurer of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 10; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 10; P.L. 1909, ch. 430, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 10; P.L. 1927, ch. 1064, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2580, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-9

; P.L. 1961, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 59, § 1.

15-2-9.1.
Additional fee for family and children trust fund.

For each license the town or city clerk shall charge and receive an additional fee of ten dollars ($10.00), of which he or she shall retain two dollars ($2.00) and shall transmit eight dollars ($8.00) to the general treasurer for deposit to the credit of the family and children trust fund created by §

42-72-30

. Each clerk shall keep an accurate account of all fees charged and received under this section and shall transmit all sums due to the general treasurer at least monthly in the manner and with the forms which the general treasurer shall prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 220, § 2.

15-2-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 287, § 10; P.L. 1938, ch. 2580, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-10

; P.L. 1964, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 91, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2004, ch. 200, § 2, effective June 29, 2004; P.L. 2004, ch. 258, § 2, effective July 1, 2004.

15-2-11.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 11; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 11; P.L. 1909, ch. 430, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 11; P.L. 1937, ch. 2504, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-11

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 63; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 41; P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 39, § 1, effective June 7, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 40, § 1, effective June 7, 2021.

15-2-12.
Recording of license information.

The several town and city clerks shall record, in separate books to be kept by them for that purpose, the information furnished to them and subscribed to as provided in §§

15-2-1

—

15-2-10

, except as otherwise provided in these sections.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 14; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-12

.

15-2-13.
Registrar in city of Providence.

In the city of Providence, the registrar of births, deaths, and marriages shall perform the duties devolved upon town and city clerks by the provisions of chapters 2 and 3 of this title, and all information provided by chapters 2 and 3 to be furnished to town and city clerks shall be furnished to the registrar in Providence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 15; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

15-2-13

.

15-2-14.
Minimum age for marriage license.

A marriage license shall only be granted to a person of full age. Attaining the age of eighteen (18) years shall be deemed full legal age pursuant to §

15-12-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 39, § 2, effective June 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 40, § 2, effective June 7, 2021.